Hawaii statutes.
[§414-463] Appeal from revocation.
(a) A foreign corporation may appeal the department director's revocation of
its certificate of authority to the circuit court within thirty days after the
certificate of revocation is signed. The foreign corporation appeals by
petitioning the court to set aside the revocation and attaching to the petition
copies of its certificate of authority and the department director's
certificate of revocation.

(b) The court may summarily order the
department director to reinstate the certificate of authority or may take any
other action the court considers appropriate.

(c) The court's final decision may be appealed
as in other civil proceedings. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next